test/src/morphology/izh-test-A-kalatoin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - kalatoin: # Adjective 'fishless'
     kalatoin+A+Sg+Nom: kalatoin
     kalatoin+A+Sg+Gen: kalattoman
     kalatoin+A+Sg+Acc: kalattoman
     kalatoin+A+Sg+Par: kalatointa
     kalatoin+A+Sg+Ill: kalattommaa
     kalatoin+A+Sg+Ine: [kalattomas, kalattomaas]
     kalatoin+A+Sg+Ela: kalattomast
     kalatoin+A+Sg+All: kalattomalle
     kalatoin+A+Sg+Ade: [kalattomal, kalattomaal]
     kalatoin+A+Sg+Abl: kalattomalt
     kalatoin+A+Sg+Tra: kalattomaks
     kalatoin+A+Sg+Ess: kalattomanna
     kalatoin+A+Sg+Exe: kalattomant

     kalatoin+A+Pl+Nom: kalattomat
     kalatoin+A+Pl+Gen: kalattommiin
     kalatoin+A+Pl+Acc: kalattomat
     kalatoin+A+Pl+Par: kalattommia
     kalatoin+A+Pl+Ill: kalattommii
     kalatoin+A+Pl+Ine: [kalattomis, kalattomiis]
     kalatoin+A+Pl+Ela: kalattomist
     kalatoin+A+Pl+All: kalattomille
     kalatoin+A+Pl+Ade: [kalattomil, kalattomiil]
     kalatoin+A+Pl+Abl: kalattomilt
     kalatoin+A+Pl+Tra: kalattomiks
     kalatoin+A+Pl+Ess: kalattominna
     kalatoin+A+Pl+Exe: kalattomint
